Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB219.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 216B.400 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Where a person has been determined to be in need of emergency care by any person with admitting authority,
the person shall not be denied admission by reason only of his or her inability to pay for services to be
rendered by the hospital.
(2) A[Every] hospital that[of this state which] offers emergency services shall provide that a physician, a sexual
assault nurse examiner, who shall be a registered nurse licensed in the Commonwealth and credentialed by the
Kentucky Board of Nursing as provided under KRS 314.142, or another qualified medical professional, as
defined by administrative regulation promulgated by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet in consultation with
the Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee as defined in KRS 403.707, is available on call
twenty-four (24) hours each day for the examinations of persons seeking treatment as victims of sexual
offenses as defined by KRS 510.040, 510.050, 510.060, 510.070, 510.080, 510.090, 510.110, 510.120,
510.130, 510.140, 530.020, 530.064(1)(a), and 531.310.
(3) (a) A hospital that offers emergency services shall provide mandatory training for all emergency medical
services staff on sexual assault emergency response requirements, protocols, and resources.
(b) The training curriculum shall be developed in collaboration with the members of the Sexual Assault
Response Team Advisory Committee appointed pursuant to Section 3 of this Act and shall include
but not be limited to the following:
1. Instruction on the provisions of:
a. KRS 49.270 to 49.490 relating to crime victims' compensation coverage and
reimbursement and any related administrative regulations promulgated by the Public
Protection Cabinet;
b. KRS 214.185 relating to the diagnosis and treatment of disease, addictions, or other
conditions of a minor;
c. KRS 216B.015 relating to the definition of a sexual assault examination facility;
d. KRS 216B.140 relating to medical and diagnostic services for minor victims of sexual
violence;
e. This section relating to hospital duties to victims of sexual violence and victims' rights
and related administrative regulations promulgated by the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services;
f. KRS 216B.401 relating to SANE-ready hospitals that have sexual assault nurse
examiner available on call twenty-four (24) hours a day;
g. Administrative regulations promulgated by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet
relating to protocols for sexual assault forensic exams and storage of sexual assault
forensic exam kits; and
h. Administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Nursing relating to
sexual assault nurse examiner credentialing and standards;
2. An overview of:
a. The Kentucky Medical Protocol for Child Sexual Assault/Abuse Evaluation;
b. Resources related to sexual assault available from the Kentucky Hospital Association;
and
c. The Kentucky State Police sexual assault forensic examination (SAFE) kit tracking
portal; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. Instruction on:
a. Forensic evidence collection provided by a credentialed sexual assault nurse examiner
and a board-certified child abuse pediatrician or designee; and
b. Services provided by a rape crisis center and a children's advocacy center.
(4) An examination provided in accordance with this section of a victim of a sexual offense may be performed in a
sexual assault examination facility as defined in KRS 216B.015. An examination under this section shall apply
only to an examination of a victim.
(5)[(4)] The physician, sexual assault nurse examiner, or other qualified medical professional, acting under a
statewide medical forensic protocol which shall be developed by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet in
consultation with the Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee as defined in KRS 403.707, and
promulgated by the secretary of justice and public safety pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A shall, upon the request
of any peace officer or prosecuting attorney, and with the consent of the victim, or upon the request of the
victim, examine the victim for the purposes of providing basic medical care relating to the incident and
gathering samples that may be used as physical evidence. This examination shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Basic treatment and sample gathering services; and
(b) Laboratory tests, as appropriate.
(6)[(5)] Each victim shall be informed of available services for treatment of sexually transmitted infections,
pregnancy, and other medical and psychiatric problems. Pregnancy counseling shall not include abortion
counseling or referral information.
(7)[(6)] Each victim shall be informed of available crisis intervention or other mental health services provided
by regional rape crisis centers providing services to victims of sexual assault.
(8)[(7)] Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a minor may consent to examination under this section.
This consent is not subject to disaffirmance because of minority, and consent of the parents or guardians of the
minor is not required for the examination.
(9)[(8)] (a) The examinations provided in accordance with this section and other services provided to a
victim pursuant to subsection (9) of this section shall be paid for by the Crime Victims Compensation
Board at a rate to be determined by the administrative regulation promulgated by the board after
consultation with the Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee as defined in KRS 403.707.
Payment for services rendered pursuant to subsection (10)[(9)] of this section shall be made at a rate not
to exceed the Medicaid reimbursement rate for the same or similar services.
(b) Upon receipt of a completed claim form supplied by the board and an itemized billing for a forensic
sexual assault examination or related services that are within the scope of practice of the respective
provider and were performed no more than twelve (12) months prior to submission of the form, the
board shall reimburse the hospital or sexual assault examination facility, pharmacist, health department,
physician, sexual assault nurse examiner, or other qualified medical professional as provided in
administrative regulations promulgated by the board pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A. Reimbursement
shall be made to an out-of-state nurse who is credentialed in the other state to provide sexual assault
examinations, an out-of-state hospital, or an out-of-state physician if the sexual assault occurred in
Kentucky.
(c) Independent investigation by the Crime Victims Compensation Board shall not be required for payment
of claims under this section; however, the board may require additional documentation or proof that the
forensic medical examination was performed.
(10)[(9)] When an examination of a victim of a sexual offense is provided in accordance with this section, no
charge shall be made to the victim by the hospital, the sexual assault examination facility, the physician, the
pharmacist, the health department, the sexual assault nurse examiner, other qualified medical professional, the
victim's insurance carrier, or the Commonwealth for:
(a) Sexual assault examinations, whether or not the exam is completed;
(b) Prophylactic medical treatment;
(c) Strangulation assessments; or

CHAPTER 8 3
(d) Other medical tests or services, including triage and ambulance expenses, related to the incident, exam,
or treatment which occur on the same date as the original exam.
(11)[(10)] (a) Each victim shall have the right to determine whether a report or other notification shall be made
to law enforcement, except where reporting of abuse and neglect of a child or a vulnerable adult is
required, as set forth in KRS 209.030 and 620.030. No victim shall be denied an examination, or billed
in violation of subsection (10)[(9)] of this section, because the victim chooses not to file a police report,
cooperate with law enforcement, or otherwise participate in the criminal justice system.
(b) If the victim chooses to report to law enforcement, the hospital shall notify law enforcement within
twenty-four (24) hours.
(c) 1. All samples collected during an exam where the victim has chosen not to immediately report to
law enforcement shall be stored, released, and destroyed, if appropriate, in accordance with an
administrative regulation promulgated by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet in consultation
with the Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee as defined in KRS 403.707.
2. Facilities collecting samples pursuant to this section may provide the required secure storage,
sample destruction, and related activities, or may enter into agreements with other agencies
qualified to do so, pursuant to administrative regulation.
3. All samples collected pursuant to this section shall be stored for at least one (1) year from the
date of collection in accordance with the administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to this
subsection.
4. Notwithstanding KRS 524.140, samples collected during exams where the victim chose not to
report immediately or file a report within one (1) year after collection may be destroyed as set
forth in accordance with the administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to this subsection.
The victim shall be informed of this process at the time of the examination. No hospital, sexual
assault examination facility, or designated storage facility shall be liable for destruction of
samples after the required storage period has expired.
Section 2. KRS 314.011 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context thereof requires otherwise:
(1) "Board" means Kentucky Board of Nursing;
(2) "Delegation" means directing a competent person to perform a selected nursing activity or task in a selected
situation under the nurse's supervision and pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated by the board in
accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A;
(3) "Nurse" means a person who is licensed or holds the privilege to practice under the provisions of this chapter
as a registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse;
(4) "Nursing process" means the investigative approach to nursing practice utilizing a method of problem-solving
by means of:
(a) Nursing diagnosis, a systematic investigation of a health concern, and an analysis of the data collected
in order to arrive at an identifiable problem; and
(b) Planning, implementation, and evaluation based on nationally accepted standards of nursing practice;
(5) "Registered nurse" means one who is licensed or holds the privilege under the provisions of this chapter to
engage in registered nursing practice;
(6) "Registered nursing practice" means the performance of acts requiring substantial specialized knowledge,
judgment, and nursing skill based upon the principles of psychological, biological, physical, and social
sciences in the application of the nursing process in:
(a) The care, counsel, and health teaching of the ill, injured, or infirm;
(b) The maintenance of health or prevention of illness of others;
(c) The administration of medication and treatment as prescribed by a physician, physician assistant,
dentist, or advanced practice registered nurse and as further authorized or limited by the board, and
which are consistent either with American Nurses' Association Scope and Standards of Practice or with
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
standards of practice established by nationally accepted organizations of registered nurses. Components
of medication administration include but are not limited to:
1. Preparing and giving medications in the prescribed dosage, route, and frequency, including
dispensing medications only as defined in subsection (17)(b) of this section;
2. Observing, recording, and reporting desired effects, untoward reactions, and side effects of drug
therapy;
3. Intervening when emergency care is required as a result of drug therapy;
4. Recognizing accepted prescribing limits and reporting deviations to the prescribing individual;
5. Recognizing drug incompatibilities and reporting interactions or potential interactions to the
prescribing individual; and
6. Instructing an individual regarding medications;
(d) The supervision, teaching of, and delegation to other personnel in the performance of activities relating
to nursing care; and
(e) The performance of other nursing acts which are authorized or limited by the board, and which are
consistent either with American Nurses' Association Standards of Practice or with Standards of Practice
established by nationally accepted organizations of registered nurses;
(7) "Advanced practice registered nurse" or "APRN" means a certified nurse practitioner, certified registered
nurse anesthetist, certified nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist, who is licensed to engage in advance
practice registered nursing pursuant to KRS 314.042 and certified in at least one (1) population focus;
(8) "Advanced practice registered nursing" means the performance of additional acts by registered nurses who
have gained advanced clinical knowledge and skills through an accredited education program that prepares the
registered nurse for one (1) of the four (4) APRN roles; who are certified by the American Nurses' Association
or other nationally established organizations or agencies recognized by the board to certify registered nurses
for advanced practice registered nursing as a certified nurse practitioner, certified registered nurse anesthetist,
certified nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist; and who certified in at least one (1) population focus. The
additional acts shall, subject to approval of the board, include but not be limited to prescribing treatment,
drugs, devices, and ordering diagnostic tests. Advanced practice registered nurses who engage in these
additional acts shall be authorized to issue prescriptions for and dispense nonscheduled legend drugs as
defined in KRS 217.905 and to issue prescriptions for but not to dispense Schedules II through V controlled
substances described in or as classified pursuant to KRS 218A.020, 218A.060, 218A.080, 218A.100, and
218A.120 under the conditions set forth in KRS 314.042 and regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board
of Nursing on or before August 15, 2006.
(a) 1. Prescriptions issued by advanced practice registered nurses for Schedule II controlled substances
classified under KRS 218A.060, except hydrocodone combination products as defined in KRS
218A.010, shall be limited to a seventy-two (72) hour supply without any refill.
2. Prescriptions issued by advanced practice registered nurses for hydrocodone combination
products as defined in KRS 218A.010 shall be limited to a thirty (30) day supply without any
refill.
3. Prescriptions issued under this subsection for psychostimulants may be written for a thirty (30)
day supply only by an advanced practice registered nurse certified in psychiatric-mental health
nursing who is providing services in a health facility as defined in KRS Chapter 216B or in a
regional services program for mental health or individuals with an intellectual disability as
defined in KRS Chapter 210.
(b) Prescriptions issued by advanced practice registered nurses for Schedule III controlled substances
classified under KRS 218A.080 shall be limited to a thirty (30) day supply without any refill.
Prescriptions issued by advanced practice registered nurses for Schedules IV and V controlled
substances classified under KRS 218A.100 and 218A.120 shall be limited to the original prescription
and refills not to exceed a six (6) month supply.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring an advanced practice registered nurse designated by the
board as a certified registered nurse anesthetist to obtain prescriptive authority pursuant to this chapter or any
other provision of law in order to deliver anesthesia care. The performance of these additional acts shall be

CHAPTER 8 5
consistent with the certifying organization or agencies' scopes and standards of practice recognized by the
board by administrative regulation;
(9) "Licensed practical nurse" means one who is licensed or holds the privilege under the provisions of this
chapter to engage in licensed practical nursing practice;
(10) "Licensed practical nursing practice" means the performance of acts requiring knowledge and skill such as are
taught or acquired in approved schools for practical nursing in:
(a) The observing and caring for the ill, injured, or infirm under the direction of a registered nurse,
advanced practice registered nurse, physician assistant, licensed physician, or dentist;
(b) The giving of counsel and applying procedures to safeguard life and health, as defined and authorized
by the board;
(c) The administration of medication or treatment as authorized by a physician, physician assistant, dentist,
or advanced practice registered nurse and as further authorized or limited by the board which is
consistent with the National Federation of Licensed Practical Nurses or with Standards of Practice
established by nationally accepted organizations of licensed practical nurses;
(d) Teaching, supervising, and delegating except as limited by the board; and
(e) The performance of other nursing acts which are authorized or limited by the board and which are
consistent with the National Federation of Practical Nurses' Standards of Practice or with Standards of
Practice established by nationally accepted organizations of licensed practical nurses;
(11) "School of nursing" means a nursing education program preparing persons for licensure as a registered nurse
or a practical nurse;
(12) "Continuing education" means offerings beyond the basic nursing program that present specific content
planned and evaluated to meet competency based behavioral objectives which develop new skills and upgrade
knowledge;
(13) "Nursing assistance" means the performance of delegated nursing acts by unlicensed nursing personnel for
compensation under supervision of a nurse;
(14) "Sexual assault nurse examiner" means a registered nurse who has completed the required education and
clinical experience and maintains a current credential from the board as provided under KRS 314.142 to
conduct forensic examinations of victims of sexual offenses under the medical protocol issued by the Justice
and Public Safety Cabinet in consultation with the Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee
pursuant to KRS 216B.400(5)[(4)];
(15) "Competency" means the application of knowledge and skills in the utilization of critical thinking, effective
communication, interventions, and caring behaviors consistent with the nurse's practice role within the context
of the public's health, safety, and welfare;
(16) "Credential" means a current license, registration, certificate, or other similar authorization that is issued by the
board;
(17) "Dispense" means:
(a) To receive and distribute nonscheduled legend drug samples from pharmaceutical manufacturers to
patients at no charge to the patient or any other party; or
(b) To distribute nonscheduled legend drugs from a local, district, and independent health department,
subject to the direction of the appropriate governing board of the individual health department;
(18) "Dialysis care" means a process by which dissolved substances are removed from a patient's body by
diffusion, osmosis, and convection from one (1) fluid compartment to another across a semipermeable
membrane;
(19) "Dialysis technician" means a person who is not a nurse, a physician assistant, or a physician and who
provides dialysis care in a licensed renal dialysis facility under the direct, on-site supervision of a registered
nurse or a physician;
(20) "Population focus" means the section of the population within which the advanced practice registered nurse
has targeted to practice. The categories of population foci are:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) Family and individual across the lifespan;
(b) Adult gerontology;
(c) Neonatal;
(d) Pediatrics;
(e) Women's health and gender-related health; and
(f) Psychiatric mental health; and
(21) "Conviction" means but is not limited to:
(a) An unvacated adjudication of guilt;
(b) Pleading no contest or nolo contendere or entering an Alford plea; or
(c) Entering a guilty plea pursuant to a pretrial diversion order;
Regardless of whether the penalty is rebated, suspended, or probated.
Section 3. KRS 403.707 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee is established.
(2) The Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee shall be co-chaired by the executive director of the
Kentucky Association of Sexual Assault Programs and the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State
Police or the commissioner's designee.
(3) The membership of the Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee shall consist of the following:
(a) The executive director of the Kentucky Board of Nursing or the executive director's designee;
(b) The executive director of the Kentucky Nurses Association or the executive director's designee;
(c) The executive director of the Kentucky Hospital Association or the executive director's designee;
(d) The executive director of the Kentucky Association of Children's Advocacy Centers;
(e) The director of the Department of Kentucky State Police Crime Lab;
(f) The commissioner of the Department for Community Based Services or the commissioner's designee;
(g) The director of the Office of Victims Advocacy in the Office of the Attorney General or the director's
designee;
(h) A sexual assault nurse examiner appointed by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services;
(i) A representative from a sexual assault response team appointed by the executive director of the
Kentucky Association of Sexual Assault Programs;
(j) A physician appointed by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and
(k) A Commonwealth's attorney or an assistant Commonwealth's attorney appointed by the Attorney
General.
(4) Members appointed under subsection (3)(h) to (k) of this section shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing
authority and shall not serve longer than four (4) years without reappointment.
(5) The Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee shall:
(a) Serve in an advisory capacity to the Kentucky Board of Nursing in accomplishing the duties set forth
under KRS 314.142;
(b) Serve in an advisory capacity to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet in the development of the
statewide sexual assault protocol required under KRS 216B.400(5)[(4)];
(c) Develop a model protocol for the operation of sexual assault response teams which shall include the
roles of sexual assault nurse examiners, physicians, law enforcement, prosecutors, and victim
advocates;

CHAPTER 8 7
(d) Provide assistance to each regional rape crisis center, as designated by the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services, in establishing a regional sexual assault response team;
(e) Develop model policies for law enforcement agencies related to handling sexual assault examination
kits and investigating sexual assaults with a victim-centered, evidence-based approach;
(f) By January 1, 2018, report to the General Assembly on the results of the analysis of previously untested
sexual assault examination kits submitted to the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic
laboratory pursuant to 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 58, sec. 1, including whether analysis of those kits led to the
identification and prosecution of suspects and the cost to society of the offenses committed by the
suspects identified;
(g) By July 1, 2018, and by each July 1 thereafter, report to the General Assembly and to the secretary of
the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet on the number of sexual assaults reported, the number of sexual
assault examination kits submitted to the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory, the
number of kits tested, and the number of charges filed and convictions obtained in sexual assault cases
in the previous calendar year;
(h) Provide information and recommendations concerning the activities of the agency or organization
represented by each individual committee member as related to sexual assault issues and programs
within the purview of the agency or organization; and
(i) Recommend to the appropriate state agency any changes in statute, administrative regulation, training,
policy, and budget to promote a multidisciplinary response to sexual assault.
Signed by Governor March 12, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version